Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2803
Parties; representation.

(1) Parties in the Small Claims Court may be individuals, partnerships, limited liability companies, corporations, unions, associations, or any other kind of organization or entity.

(2) No party shall be represented by an attorney in the Small Claims Court except as provided in sections 25-2804 and 25-2805.

(3) An individual shall represent himself or herself in the Small Claims Court. A partnership shall be represented by a partner or one of its employees. A limited liability company shall be represented by a member, a manager, or one of its employees. A union shall be represented by a union member or union employee. A corporation shall be represented by one of its employees. An association shall be represented by one of its members or by an employee of the association. Any other kind of organization or entity shall be represented by one of its members or employees.

(4) Only a party, natural or otherwise, who has been a party to the transaction with the defendant for which the claim is brought may file and prosecute a claim in the Small Claims Court.

(5) No party may file an assigned claim in the Small Claims Court.

(6) No party shall file more than two claims within any calendar week nor more than ten claims in any calendar year in the Small Claims Court.

(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a personal representative of a decedent's estate, a guardian, or a conservator may be a party in the Small Claims Court.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 23;

Laws 1987, LB 77, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 536, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 24-523;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 174;

Laws 2010, LB712, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB71, § 1.